Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 4. Complaints Received from Consumers and the Public.

§ 63.2-1728.
Establishment of toll-free telephone line for complaints; investigation on receipt of complaints.

With such funds as are appropriated for this purpose, the Commissioner shall establish a toll-free telephone line to respond to complaints regarding operations of assisted living facilities, adult day care centers and child welfare agencies. Upon receipt of a complaint concerning the operation of an assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency, regardless of whether the program is subject to licensure, the Commissioner shall, for good cause shown, cause an investigation to be made, including on-site visits as he deems necessary, of the activities, services, records and facilities. The assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency shall afford the Commissioner reasonable opportunity to inspect all of the operator’s activities, services, records and facilities and to interview its agents and employees and any child or other person within its custody or control. Whenever an assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency subject to inspection under this section is determined by the Commissioner to be in noncompliance with the provisions of this subtitle or with regulations adopted pursuant to this subtitle, the Commissioner shall give reasonable notice to the assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency of the nature of its noncompliance and may thereafter take appropriate action as provided by law, including a suit to enjoin the operation of the assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency.

An incident report filed by an assisted living facility, pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board, for any major incident that negatively affects or threatens the life, health, safety, or welfare of any resident of the facility shall not be considered a complaint for purposes of this section and shall not be posted by the Department on a website maintained by the Department. However, upon receipt of an incident report for any major incident that negatively affects or threatens the life, health, safety, or welfare of any resident of an assisted living facility, the Commissioner may initiate an investigation including an on-site visit to the facility if the Commissioner finds, for good cause shown based upon the seriousness of the incident and the nature of any response to the incident, including any implementation of a plan of correction to address the situation giving rise to the incident, that an investigation is required to protect the life, health, safety, or welfare of a resident of the assisted living facility.

History.

1993, cc. 730, 742, § 63.1-198.03; 2002, c. 747; 2010, c. 603.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 603, cl. 2, provides: “That by November 1, 2010, the Department of Social Services shall, in consultation with key stakeholder groups, develop specific criteria by which the Department issues one-, two-, and three-year assisted living facility licenses. Such criteria shall be separately stated for each licensure period and shall be unambiguously communicated to all entities seeking initial and renewal licenses.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 603 added the second paragraph.

§ 63.2-1729.
Confidentiality of complainant’s identity.

Whenever the Department conducts inspections and investigations in response to complaints received from the public, the identity of the complainant and the identity of any resident, participant or child who is the subject of the complaint, or identified therein, shall be confidential and shall not be open to inspection by members of the public. Identities of the complainant and resident, participant or child who is the subject of the complaint shall be revealed only if a court order so requires. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the Department, in its discretion, from disclosing to the assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency the nature of the complaint or the identity of the resident, participant or child who is the subject of the complaint. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the Department or its employees from making reports under Chapter 15 (§

63.2-1500

et seq.) of this title or Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

et seq.) of Chapter 16 of this title. If the Department intends to rely, in whole or in part, on any statements made by the complainant, at any administrative hearing brought against the assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency, the Department shall disclose the identity of the complainant to the assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency a reasonable time in advance of such hearing.

History.

1994, c. 941, § 63.1-177.2; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1730.
Retaliation or discrimination against complainants.

No assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency may retaliate or discriminate in any manner against any person who (i) in good faith complains or provides information to, or otherwise cooperates with, the Department or any other agency of government or any person or entity operating under contract with an agency of government, having responsibility for protecting the rights of residents of assisted living facilities, participants in adult day care centers or children in child welfare agencies, (ii) attempts to assert any right protected by state or federal law, or (iii) assists any person in asserting such right.

History.

1994, c. 941, § 63.1-177.1; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For a note, “Are You Breaking Some Sort of Law?:
Protecting an Employee’s Informal Complaints Under the Fair Labor Standards Act’s Anti-Retaliation Provision,” see 42 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 319 (2000).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).

§ 63.2-1731.
Retaliation against reports of child or adult abuse or neglect.

No assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency may retaliate in any manner against any person who in good faith reports adult or child abuse or neglect pursuant to Chapter 15 (§

63.2-1500

et seq.) of this title or Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

et seq.) of Chapter 16 of this title.

History.

1996, c. 487, § 63.1-198.03:1; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).